Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2160.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Mexican wolf management plan development committee; membership; duties; report; delayed repeal A. The Mexican wolf management plan development committee is established consisting of the following members appointed by the Arizona game and fish commission: 1. Three public members who are sportsmen selected from a list of five names submitted jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives. 2. Three public members who are cattlemen selected from a list of five names submitted jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives. 3. Three public members who are wildlife conservationists selected from a list of five names submitted jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives. B. The committee shall develop a plan for effectively managing Mexican wolves if Mexican wolves were to be delisted from the endangered species act. The plan shall include: 1. Methods to effectively manage Mexican wolf populations by creating new hunting opportunities for sportsmen. 2. Protections for existing livestock and methods to adequately compensate ranchers for the ranchers' past roles in sustaining Mexican wolf populations. 3. Development of programs and incentives for humane and nonlethal control and deterrence of Mexican wolves to prevent conflict and takings. C. On or before December 31, 2027, the committee shall submit a report regarding the committee's activities and recommendations for legislative action to the Arizona game and fish commission, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. D. The committee may use and the Arizona game and fish commission shall provide to the committee administrative support services, including coordinating meetings and using the commission's meeting rooms, buildings and staff to conduct research and draft the report required by subsection C of this section. E. This section is repealed from and after June 30, 2028. Sec. 2. Appropriation; Arizona game and fish commission The sum of $___________ is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Arizona game and fish commission for the purposes of this act.